test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTA_AM_CNJ_waabam_gt-glossing.yaml
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Pl+Prt: waabmisnokwaaba   #3pl v 2sg !predict this, book totally unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Prt:    waabmisnogba         #3sg v 2sg !predict this
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3:    waabmigsiiwmba         #3sg v 2sg !book has this, is unsure
 
     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 2, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig+Dub: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik->isinog  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Pl+Dub: waabmaasiigwaawenh   #3pl v 3obv 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Dub:    waabmaasiigwenh #3sg v 3obv  

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+3+Pl+Dub: waabmisiigwaawenh   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+3+Dub:    waabmisiigwenh         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl+Dub: waabmigsiigwaawenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Dub:    waabmigsiigwenh      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Pl+Dub: waabmisnokwaawenh   #3pl v 2sg !book omits form
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Dub:    waabmisnogwenh         #3sg v 2sg !book omits form
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl: waabmiyaang          #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+2+Pl: waabmiyeg            #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+2:    waabmiyan            #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1:      waabmigyaanh     #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Pl:   waabmigyaang     #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+1+Pl: waabmigyang      #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+Pl:   waabmigyeg       #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2:      waabmigyan       #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Pl: waabmigooyeg       #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2:    waabmigooyan       #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl: waabminnagog        #1sg v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2:    waabminnaa          #1sg v 2sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin  (2 obj)
     #      -_  (3 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabmiyngidwaa      #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+3:    waabmiyngid         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabminnangwaa   #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3:    waabminnang      #3sg v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Pl:   waabminnegwaa    #3pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3:      waabminneg       #3sg v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pl:   waabmangdwaa   #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3:      waabmangid     #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Pl:      waabmagwaa     #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3:         waabmag        #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabmangwaa    #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3:    waabmang       #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Pl:   waabmegwaa     #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3:      waabmeg        #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pl:      waabmadwaa     #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3:         waabmad        #2sg v 3sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin  (2 obj)
     #      -_  (3 obj)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt: waabmiyngidwaaba   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmiyngidba         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt: waabminnangwaaba  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Prt:    waabminnangba     #3sg v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:   waabminnegwaaba     #3pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Prt:      waabminnegba           #3sg v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:   waabmangdwaaba  #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Prt:      waabmangdiba    #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Pl+Prt:      waabmagwaaba  #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Prt:         waabmagba     #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt: waabmangwaaba  #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmangba    #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:   waabmegwaaba  #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Prt:      waabmegba    #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pl+Prt:      waabmadwaaba  #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Prt:         waabmadba    #2sg v 3sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 3, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin  (2 obj)
     #      -_->aa  (3 obj) 

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub: waabmiwngidwaawenh   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+3+Dub:    waabmiwngidenh       #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub: waabminnangwaawenh  #3pl v 21pl !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub: waabminnankwaawenh  #3pl v 21pl !book
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Dub:    waabminnangwenh     #3sg v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:   waabminnegwaawenh     #3pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Dub:      waabminnegwenh           #3sg v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:   waabmaawngidwaawenh  #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Dub:      waabmaawngidenh    #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Pl+Dub:      waabmaawgwaawenh  #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Dub:         waabmaawgenh     #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub: waabmaawngwaawenh  #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Dub:    waabmaawngwenh    #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:   waabmaawegwaawenh  #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Dub:      waabmaawegwenh    #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pl+Dub:      waabmaawdwaawenh  #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Dub:         waabmaawdenh    #2sg v 3sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+Prt: waabmiyaangba  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+2+Pl+Prt: waabmiyegba   #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+2+Prt:    waabmiymba    #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Pl+Prt:   waabmigyaangba #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Prt:      waabmigyaambaanh    #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+1+Pl+Prt: waabmigyangba #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+Pl+Prt:   waabmigyegba    #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+Prt:      waabmigyamba    #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Prt: waabmigooyegba #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Prt:    waabmigooymba #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+Prt: waabminnaggoba #1sg v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Prt:    waabminnaambaanh     #1sg v 2sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+1+Pl+Dub: waabmiwaangenh  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+2+Pl+Dub: waabmiwegwenh    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+2+Dub:    waabmiwnenh    #2sg v 1sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+2+Dub:    waabmiwne       #2sg v 1sg !book

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Dub:      waabmigwaanenh    #0 v 1sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Dub:      waabmigwaane    #0 v 1sg !book (?)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Pl+Dub:   waabmigwaangenh #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+1+Pl+Dub: waabmigwangwenh #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+Pl+Dub:   waabmigwegwenh    #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+Dub:      waabmigwanenh       #0 v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+2+Dub:      waabmigwanen       #0 v 2sg !book

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Dub: waabmigoowegwenh #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Dub:    waabmigoownenh    #1pl v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Dub:    waabmigoownen    #1pl v 2sg !book

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+Dub: waabminnaggwenh #1sg v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Dub:    waabminnaanenh      #1sg v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Dub:    waabminnaanen      #1sg v 2sg !cons (?)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+3+Pl: waabmaawaad        #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+3:    waabmaad           #3sg v 3obv

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+3+Pl: waabmiwaad           #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+3:    waabmid              #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl: waabmigwaad        #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3:    waabmigod          #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl: waabmikwaa          #3pl v 2sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3:    waabmik             #3sg v 2sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+3+Pl+Prt: waabmaawaapa  #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+3+Prt:    waabmaapa        #3sg v 3obv

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+3+Pl+Prt: waabmiwaapa   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+3+Prt:    waabmipa         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl+Prt: waabmigwaapa #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Prt:    waabmigpa      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl+Prt: waabmikwaaba   #3pl v 2sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Prt:    waabmikba         #3sg v 2sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig+Dub: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+3+Pl+Dub: waabmaawaagwenh #3pl v 3obv !book provides nothing, this is best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+3+Dub:    waabmaagwenh    #3sg v 3obv

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+3+Pl+Dub: waabmiwaagwenh   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+3+Dub:    waabmigwenh         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl+Dub: waabmigwaagwenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !cons
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl+Dub: waabmigwegwenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !book (this can't be right, eg is 2pl)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Dub:    waabmigoogwenh      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg !less anomalous than it seems, just lengthen igo in this context (compensatory lenghtenging?) (don't use igoo, that disrupts orderliness)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl+Dub: waabmikwaawenh   #3pl v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl+Dub: waabmikwaawen   #3pl v 2sg !book 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Dub:    waabmikenh         #3sg v 2sg !hm no w4
